Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; UNION GOSPEL MISSION COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT CENTER.new text end new text begin $8,856,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Union Gospel Mission, Inc., a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip a community engagement center in the city of Duluth to serve people experiencing homelessness. This appropriation includes money for a commercial kitchen, warming center space, indoor and outdoor space for guests, health service facilities, classrooms and offices, and laundry and hygiene facilities. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end